Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4733.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 48721. (1) The commission shall issue an order under part 411 establishing possession limits of fish consistent with this section. An individual shall not possess more than the daily possession limit or aggregate daily possession limit, as applicable, of fish at the place where the fish were taken or in en route from that place to either of the following: (a) His or her The individual's automobile or other principal means of land transportation. (b) His or her The individual's residence or temporary place of lodging. (2) In addition to 1 day's possession limit of fish, an individual may possess an the following: (a) Outside that individual's residence, an additional 2 days' possession limit of fish that are processed by any of the following methods: (i) (a) Canning in a sealed container. (ii) (b) Curing by smoking or drying. (iii) (c) Freezing in a solid state. (b) In that individual's residence, an unlimited number of days' possession limits of fish that are processed by any of the following methods: (i) Canning in a sealed container. (ii) Curing by smoking or drying. (iii) Freezing in a solid state. (3) An individual's processed fish aboard a vessel, on the water or at dockside, are considered to be in the individual's possession for the purposes of subsection (2)(a). (4) An individual shall not possess a fish illegally taken.